Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
WATER RIGHTS AND WORKS - GENERAL

31-35-101. Powers - canals - water rights - diversion - ratification of prior rights.

Any municipality in this state, for the purpose of supplying said municipality and the inhabitants thereof with water, has the power under this part 1:

To purchase or lease any canal or ditch constructed, with all the rights, privileges, and franchises of any person owning or having any interest in or right to the same, and to hold and operate the said canals and ditches in the same manner as the persons from which the same is purchased or leased if a majority of the registered electors of such municipality voting at any regular election vote in favor of said purchase;

To repair, improve, or enlarge any canal or ditch which is leased or purchased or any flume, dam, or gate connected therewith and for such purposes to levy and collect taxes as other taxes are levied and collected by law;

To purchase water and water rights in all cases where condemnation would lie to obtain the same under section 31-15-708 (1)(b);

To divert the waters acquired by purchase to the amount and extent lawfully appropriated prior to said purchase;

To purchase and hold the lands with which said water right is connected when deemed necessary and proper by the governing body, whether the same are within or beyond the municipal limits, or to lease or sell such lands when deemed advisable by said governing body.

Any municipality making a purchase or lease of any canal or ditch shall thereby assume all obligations and other duties which by law devolve upon the owner of such ditch or canal and from whom the same may be acquired by the powers of this section.

The right to hold and retain water rights, or such lands and water rights as have been purchased by any municipality in this state prior to April 2, 1891, for the purpose of providing water for the use thereof or that of its inhabitants, the right to divert the water belonging to such rights to the use of such municipality and the inhabitants thereof, and the right to sell and dispose of such lands so purchased separate and apart from the water rights, as provided in paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of this section, are hereby given, ratified, and confirmed to such municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1245, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(e) amended, (SB 10-181), ch. 373, p. 1745, § 1, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-35-101 to 31-35-105 as they existed prior to 1975.

31-35-102. Ditch and canal management.

The management of any ditch or canal acquired pursuant to section 31-35-101 shall be under the control of the governing body of such acquiring municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1245, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-102 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-103. Trustees of waterworks - duties.

The registered electors of any city or town may elect at a special election held for that purpose three trustees to constitute a board to have the care, operation, management, and control of waterworks owned or acquired by the city or town, subject to the conditions of sections 31-35-104 to 31-35-111.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1245, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-106 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-104. First election of trustees.

If, at the election provided in section 31-35-111, the majority of votes cast are for the board of trustees, the mayor shall issue a call for a special election of such board of trustees, to be conducted by the clerk in accordance with the provisions of section 31-35-106 and the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965" insofar as practicable. If the entire city or town is included within the jurisdiction of such board of trustees, the election may be held in conjunction with the regular election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1245, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-107 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-35-105. Trustees - qualifications.

No person not a resident and owner of realty within the city or town for the period of at least one year next preceding his election and residing in that part or district of the city or town for which the board of trustees is to be elected shall be eligible for election as a trustee of said board.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1246, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-108 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-106. Regular election of trustees.

The regular election for electing trustees under the provisions of this part 1, after the first election to be called by the mayor, shall be held biennially on the first Tuesday in June; but if the entire city or town is included within the jurisdiction of such board of trustees, the election may be held in conjunction with the regular election. The election shall be conducted by the clerk in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965" insofar as practicable. Only registered electors who reside in that part of the city or town within the jurisdiction of such board of trustees shall be permitted to vote in such election. Likewise only registered electors residing in such part of the city or town shall be permitted to vote on any proposition to create or contract a debt or loan for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, or extending waterworks.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1246, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-109 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-35-107. Trustees - quorum - existing boards - secretary.

The first board of trustees elected pursuant to this part 1 shall be elected as follows: One for the period of two years, one for the period of four years, and one for the period of six years; and, at the end of each term, a board member shall be elected for a term of six years. The ballot at the first election shall designate the term for which the candidate is to be elected.

Said board shall constitute a body corporate to be known as the "trustees of ............ waterworks", the name of the city or town to be inserted in said title, and shall be a party to all suits, proceedings, and contracts, the same as are municipalities in this state. Said board shall have control of all real estate owned, controlled, or acquired on or after April 15, 1903, by the city or town or any board of trustees or other body used in connection with said waterworks in operating waterworks constructed, including mains, pipes, reservoirs, buildings, machinery, lands, leases, water, water rights and privileges of every kind belonging thereto, and property of every kind and description, and the title to the same shall vest in said board of trustees, and their successors in office, as trustees for the use and benefit of the city or town or part or district of the city or town and the inhabitants and property therein supplied from said waterworks.

As soon as said board of trustees organizes, it shall have all the power to manage, repair, control, and extend and have all other powers in and about and over said property to acquire, purchase, and develop water and water rights and to exchange and extinguish the indebtedness growing out of the same or existing as of April 15, 1903, against waterworks possessed by any such city or town on said date. A majority of the trustees shall be a quorum and competent to bind the whole number by act and deed.

The question of contracting a bonded debt or for funding or floating bonded indebtedness shall be submitted to the registered electors of the city or town or part or district of the city or town at a special election to be called for voting upon such proposition; except that when the registered electors of any said city or town, prior to the establishment of a board of trustees under this part 1, have authorized by election the acquisition, construction, and operation of a municipal waterworks system and the incurring of indebtedness therefor and indebtedness for such purpose exists after creation of the board, no further election shall be necessary to permit the contracting of additional bonded debt or for funding or floating additional bonded indebtedness for the purpose of carrying out the powers granted under this title to cities or towns regarding waterworks, water rights, and property and the management, maintenance, development, and expansion thereof.

The provisions of this part 1 regarding indebtedness and limitations thereon in connection with water and waterworks shall apply to indebtedness created by the board of trustees elected under this part 1 as shall the provisions of other sections of the statutes of this state relating to bonded indebtedness for said purposes.

The board of trustees may employ a secretary.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1246, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-110 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-108. Acts of board - meetings - vacancies - compensation and bond.

No members of the board of trustees shall have any authority to act on behalf of the board except in pursuance of an order regularly made at a meeting of the board. No action of the board shall be binding unless authorized by a majority of the trustees at a regular meeting or a duly called special meeting. Meetings of the board of trustees shall be held at the office of the waterworks and shall be open to the public. A record of the meetings shall be kept by the secretary in a book provided for that purpose, which book, together with all contracts, maps, plans, and documents relating to the management and operation of the waterworks, shall be open to public inspection at reasonable hours. No member of said board shall be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract relating to the waterworks or in any contract providing for the expenditure of any moneys in relation thereto. Any such trustee shall be considered as vacating his office in the event of his violating this section or accepting the nomination or becoming a candidate for any other public office. In the event of a vacancy by death, resignation, or otherwise, the board shall fill said vacancy by electing some qualified person to fill the vacancy until the next election at which time the vacancy shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term. Trustees under this part 1 shall receive five hundred dollars per year for their services, and each of said trustees shall enter into a bond of two thousand dollars to the people of the district for the faithful performance of their duties and the proper accounting of all moneys that may come into their hands as trustees.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1247, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-111 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-109. Semiannual statement of condition.

The board of trustees shall make, twice a year, on June 1 and December 1, a full and complete statement in detail of all moneys collected and expended by it during the preceding six months and of the condition of the waterworks under its control. The statement shall be published at least one time in a daily newspaper published in the county in which said waterworks are located.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1247, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-112 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-110. Annual statement of estimate.

The board of trustees shall render each year, before the making by the governing body of its annual appropriations, a statement to the governing body of the estimated amount, to be raised by taxation, required by such board for the proper maintenance and care of said waterworks during the next succeeding fiscal year, which amount shall be included in the levy fixed by the governing body upon the property in that part or district of the city or town supplied by said waterworks.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1247, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-113 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-111. Election.

Before the people of any city or town or part or district of any city or town can avail themselves of the provisions of this section and of sections 31-35-104 to 31-35-110, the question to determine their wishes shall first be submitted to the registered electors of said city or town or part or district of the city or town at a special election to be called by the mayor of said city or town upon petition presented to him signed by at least one hundred taxpaying electors who reside in the city or town or that part or district of the city or town for which the board of trustees may be asked. If the entire city or town is proposed to be included within the jurisdiction of such board of trustees, such election may be held in conjunction with the regular election. At said election the ballot or voting machine tabs shall be "For the Board of Trustees" and "Against the Board of Trustees". The election shall be conducted by the clerk in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965" insofar as practicable. If the majority of votes cast is against the creation of the board of trustees, no further action may be taken under this section and sections 31-35-104 to 31-35-110 for a period of one year from such election and then only on petition as provided in said sections.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1248, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-114 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.